Massachusetts, session 194th, S2097.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 42B of Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
subsection (e) the following subsection:-
(f) A corporation under this section shall be required to:
(1) disclose the amount, type, and source of all current and pending research support
received by, or expected to be received by, the corporation for all qualified exemption years;
(2) certify that the disclosure is current, accurate, and complete; and
(3) agree to update such disclosure at request at any time determined appropriate.
of 1